6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX pH Y 43
SFX pH ouvoir ouvoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' mouvoir po:infi
SFX pH ouvoir ouvant/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ppre
SFX pH ouvoir u/L'D'Q' .mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir us/D'Q' mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir ue/L'D'Q' mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir ues/D'Q' mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir eus/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir eut/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir euvent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvais/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvait/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvions/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouviez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvaient/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir us/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ut/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ûmes/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ûtes/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir urent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrai/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvras/n'q'l'm't' mouvoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvra/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrons/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvront/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrais/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrait/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrions/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvriez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvraient/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir euve/n'q'j'l'm't's' mouvoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir euves/n'l'm't' mouvoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir usse/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pH ouvoir usses/n'q'l'm't' mouvoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ût/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ussions/n'q'l't' mouvoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ussiez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ussent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir eus/n'l'm' mouvoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/n'l' mouvoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/n'l'm' mouvoir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pI N 2
SFX pI ouvoir û/q' mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pI ouvoir u/q' mouvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pJ N 43
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoir pourvoir po:infi
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyant pourvoir po:ppre
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvu pourvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvus pourvoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvue pourvoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvues pourvoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvois pourvoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoit pourvoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyons pourvoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyez pourvoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoient pourvoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyais pourvoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyait pourvoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyions pourvoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyiez pourvoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyaient pourvoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvus pourvoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvut pourvoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvûmes pourvoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvûtes pourvoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvurent pourvoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirai pourvoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiras pourvoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoira pourvoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirons pourvoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirez pourvoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiront pourvoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirais pourvoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirait pourvoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirions pourvoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiriez pourvoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiraient pourvoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoie pourvoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoies pourvoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvusse pourvoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvusses pourvoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvût pourvoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussions pourvoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussiez pourvoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussent pourvoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvois pourvoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyons pourvoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyez pourvoir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pK Y 43
SFX pK cevoir cevoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' cevoir po:infi
SFX pK cevoir cevant/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ppre
SFX pK cevoir çu/L'D'Q' cevoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pK cevoir çus/D'Q' cevoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pK cevoir çue/L'D'Q' cevoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pK cevoir çues/D'Q' cevoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pK cevoir çois/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir çoit/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir cevons/n'q'l't' cevoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir cevez/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir çoivent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pK cevoir cevais/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir cevait/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir cevions/n'q'l't' cevoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir ceviez/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir cevaient/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pK cevoir çus/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir çut/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir çûmes/n'q'l't' cevoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir çûtes/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir çurent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pK cevoir cevrai/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pK cevoir cevras/n'q'l'm't' cevoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir cevra/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir cevrons/n'q'l't' cevoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir cevrez/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir cevront/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pK cevoir cevrais/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir cevrait/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir cevrions/n'q'l't' cevoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir cevriez/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir cevraient/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pK cevoir çoive/n'q'j'l'm't's' cevoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir çoives/n'l'm't' cevoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir çusse/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pK cevoir çusses/n'q'l'm't' cevoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir çût/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pK cevoir çussions/n'q'l't' cevoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir çussiez/n'q'l'm' cevoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pK cevoir çussent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pK cevoir çois/n'l'm't' cevoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pK cevoir cevons/n'l' cevoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pK cevoir cevez/n'l'm' cevoir po:impe po:2pl
