6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
apercevoir/pK()
concevoir/pK()
décevoir/pK()
dépourvoir/pJ()
émouvoir/pH()
entrapercevoir/pK()
entr'apercevoir/pK()
mouvoir/pHpI()
percevoir/pK()
pourvoir/pJ()
promouvoir/pH()
recevoir/pK()
